Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4650.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [15.05912] ANTI-ASIAN, ANTI-ASIAN INDIAN, AND ANTI-RELIGIOUS HATE PREVENTION; OMBUDSPERSON. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Purpose. new text end new text begin This section shall serve to address gaps in identifying and investigating hate incidents and hate crimes targeting persons of Asian and Asian Indian descent. The intent is to: new text end new text begin (1) prevent, monitor, and address incidents of anti-Asian and anti-Asian Indian bias, discrimination, and hate; new text end new text begin (2) prevent, monitor, and address incidents of anti-religious bias, discrimination, and hate; new text end new text begin (3) prevent, monitor, and address incidents of anti-immigration bias for all lawful immigration categories; and new text end new text begin (4) improve coordination among state agencies, law enforcement, schools, and community organizations. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Asian descent" means individuals with ancestry in any Asian ethnic or national group and explicitly includes persons of South Asian descent, including Asian Indians, and all other Asian communities. new text end new text begin (c) "Bias-motivated conduct" means conduct that is committed because of the actual or perceived class of race; perceived race; ethnicity, including but not limited to individuals of Asian descent; national origin; all religious faiths; or the immigration status of the victim. new text end new text begin (d) "Hate crime" means a criminal offense motivated by bias-motivated conduct. new text end new text begin (e) "Hate incident" means noncriminal bias-motivated conduct. new text end new text begin (f) "Immigration status" means an individual's actual or perceived immigration classification, including citizenship status, lawful permanent residency, work-authorized visas and permits, refugees, asylum seekers, and any other immigration category. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin (a) The Office of the Ombudsperson for Anti-Asian, Anti-Asian Indian, and Anti-Religious Hate Prevention is established. The ombudsperson operates independently from and in collaboration with the Council of Asian-Pacific Minnesotans. The ombudsperson is appointed by the Legislative Coordinating Commission and serves for a four-year term and may be reappointed. The ombudsperson serves in the unclassified service and may be removed only for just cause. The ombudsperson must be selected based on experience in human rights, community engagement, hate-crime prevention, and other related fields. new text end new text begin (b) The ombudsperson may hire an assistant who the ombudsperson determines necessary to discharge responsibilities of the office. The assistant serves in the unclassified service. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin The ombudsperson shall: new text end new text begin (1) receive and review complaints related to anti-Asian or anti-religious hate, discrimination, and bias incidents; new text end new text begin (2) assist individuals in navigating the complaint processes within state agencies, local governments, and law enforcement; new text end new text begin (3) provide advocacy for individuals navigating the complaint process; new text end new text begin (4) identify systemic issues related to hate-motivated incidents and recommend policy changes to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over human rights; new text end new text begin (5) provide outreach, education, and training to communities, schools, and public agencies; new text end new text begin (6) develop and maintain a statewide disaggregated reporting system for bias and hate incidents; new text end new text begin (7) coordinate with the Department of Public Safety on hate-crime data collection and response that is required under section 626.5531; new text end new text begin (8) collaborate with Asian communities and organizations serving Asian Minnesotans and religious minority communities; and new text end new text begin (9) refer appropriate matters to authorities when necessary. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Bias-aware training. new text end new text begin (a) The ombudsperson shall develop bias-aware investigation training and cultural competency education modules for use by state agencies and state and local law enforcement agencies. The modules must also be designed to be used in kindergarten through grade 12 school curricula and community programs that address stereotypes of persons due to perceived race, ethnicity, national origin, or religious affiliation. new text end new text begin (b) Training must address bias, stereotyping, and misinformation related to immigration status, work-authorized visas, and foreign-born professionals, including those in employment-based immigration programs. new text end new text begin (c) Training must address prosecution, prevention, and responding to hate incidents and hate crimes, bias-motivated conduct, and discrimination by individuals or entities targeting individuals based on race and ethnicity, including Asian descent and religious faith and practices in order to promote education; community engagement; and collaboration between law enforcement, and the Minnesota Attorney General. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Victim services. new text end new text begin (a) In addition to victim services under chapter 611A, the ombudsperson shall create a program for community-specific organizations that offer support and culturally competent services to victims of bias-motivated conduct, hate incidents, and hate crimes. The ombudsperson shall create a resource directory of culturally specific organizations that can be accessed by community organizations and all interested organizations. new text end new text begin (b) The ombudsperson shall assist immigrant workers, including holders of employment-based visas, in accessing culturally competent victim services. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Authority. new text end new text begin To carry out the duties of this section, the ombudsperson shall: new text end new text begin (1) access nonconfidential data held by state agencies that is relevant to a complaint; new text end new text begin (2) request cooperation from state and local agencies; new text end new text begin (3) convene interagency working groups to further the purposes of the office; new text end new text begin (4) issue nonbinding recommendations to agencies, schools, and law enforcement; and new text end new text begin (5) partner with community organizations to support outreach and education. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Data practices. new text end new text begin (a) Data collected by the ombudsperson is governed by chapter 13. new text end new text begin (b) Identifying information about complainants is private data on individuals unless the complainant consents to disclosure. Information used in reports must deidentify the complainant. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Reports. new text end new text begin Information collected by the ombudsperson shall be reported quarterly to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over human rights and criminal law. The information collected must be used to strengthen laws to prosecute hate crimes and used to provide resources for educational initiatives in state agencies and educational systems to address bias-motivated hate incidents and crimes. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Civil actions. new text end new text begin The ombudsperson and the ombudsperson's designee are not civilly liable for any actions taken under this section if the action was taken in good faith, was within the scope of the ombudsperson's authority, and did not constitute willful or reckless conduct. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the ombudsperson for anti-Asian, anti-Asian Indian, and anti-religious hate prevention for operation of the ombudsperson's office, collection of hate incidents and hate crime occurrences, support for victims of hate incidents and hate crimes against people of Asian descent, development of education and training tools for bias awareness, and support for community organizations dealing with bias awareness training and education. The ombudsperson shall coordinate with community-specific organizations for people of Asian and Asian Indian descent. new text end new text begin (b) The general fund base for this appropriation is $....... in fiscal year 2028 and $....... in fiscal year 2029. new text end